Illinois, session 104th, SB1878.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 5amended by adding Section 5-45.65 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.65 new)7    Sec. 5-45.65. Emergency rulemaking; student teaching 8stipend program. To provide for the expeditious and timely 9implementation of Section 9.45 of the Board of Higher 10Education Act, emergency rules implementing Section 9.45 of 11the Board of Higher Education Act may be adopted in accordance 12with Section 5-45 by the Board of Higher Education. The 13adoption of emergency rules authorized by Section 5-45 and 14this Section is deemed to be necessary for the public 15interest, safety, and welfare.16    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 17of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 18    Section 10. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 19changing Sections 16-127, 16-158, and 16-203 as follows: 20    (40 ILCS 5/16-127)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 16-127)21    Sec. 16-127. Computation of creditable service.   SB1878- 2 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1    (a) Each member shall receive regular credit for all 2service as a teacher from the date membership begins, for 3which satisfactory evidence is supplied and all contributions 4have been paid.5    (b) The following periods of service shall earn optional 6credit and each member shall receive credit for all such 7service for which satisfactory evidence is supplied and all 8contributions have been paid as of the date specified:9        (1) Prior service as a teacher.10        (2) Service in a capacity essentially similar or 11    equivalent to that of a teacher, in the public common 12    schools in school districts in this State not included 13    within the provisions of this System, or of any other 14    State, territory, dependency or possession of the United 15    States, or in schools operated by or under the auspices of 16    the United States, or under the auspices of any agency or 17    department of any other State, and service during any 18    period of professional speech correction or special 19    education experience for a public agency within this State 20    or any other State, territory, dependency or possession of 21    the United States, and service prior to February 1, 1951 22    as a recreation worker for the Illinois Department of 23    Public Safety, for a period not exceeding the lesser of 24    2/5 of the total creditable service of the member or 10 25    years. The maximum service of 10 years which is allowable 26    under this paragraph shall be reduced by the service   SB1878- 3 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1    credit which is validated by other retirement systems 2    under paragraph (i) of Section 15-113 and paragraph 1 of 3    Section 17-133. Credit granted under this paragraph may 4    not be used in determination of a retirement annuity or 5    disability benefits unless the member has at least 5 years 6    of creditable service earned subsequent to this employment 7    with one or more of the following systems: Teachers' 8    Retirement System of the State of Illinois, State 9    Universities Retirement System, and the Public School 10    Teachers' Pension and Retirement Fund of Chicago. Whenever 11    such service credit exceeds the maximum allowed for all 12    purposes of this Article, the first service rendered in 13    point of time shall be considered. The changes to this 14    paragraph (2) made by Public Act 86-272 shall apply not 15    only to persons who on or after its effective date (August 16    23, 1989) are in service as a teacher under the System, but 17    also to persons whose status as such a teacher terminated 18    prior to such effective date, whether or not such person 19    is an annuitant on that date.20        (3) Any periods immediately following teaching 21    service, under this System or under Article 17, (or 22    immediately following service prior to February 1, 1951 as 23    a recreation worker for the Illinois Department of Public 24    Safety) spent in active service with the military forces 25    of the United States; periods spent in educational 26    programs that prepare for return to teaching sponsored by   SB1878- 4 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1    the federal government following such active military 2    service; if a teacher returns to teaching service within 3    one calendar year after discharge or after the completion 4    of the educational program, a further period, not 5    exceeding one calendar year, between time spent in 6    military service or in such educational programs and the 7    return to employment as a teacher under this System; and a 8    period of up to 2 years of active military service not 9    immediately following employment as a teacher.10        The changes to this Section and Section 16-128 11    relating to military service made by Public Act 87-794 12    shall apply not only to persons who on or after its 13    effective date are in service as a teacher under the 14    System, but also to persons whose status as a teacher 15    terminated prior to that date, whether or not the person 16    is an annuitant on that date. In the case of an annuitant 17    who applies for credit allowable under this Section for a 18    period of military service that did not immediately follow 19    employment, and who has made the required contributions 20    for such credit, the annuity shall be recalculated to 21    include the additional service credit, with the increase 22    taking effect on the date the System received written 23    notification of the annuitant's intent to purchase the 24    credit, if payment of all the required contributions is 25    made within 60 days of such notice, or else on the first 26    annuity payment date following the date of payment of the   SB1878- 5 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1    required contributions. In calculating the automatic 2    annual increase for an annuity that has been recalculated 3    under this Section, the increase attributable to the 4    additional service allowable under Public Act 87-794 shall 5    be included in the calculation of automatic annual 6    increases accruing after the effective date of the 7    recalculation.8        Credit for military service shall be determined as 9    follows: if entry occurs during the months of July, 10    August, or September and the member was a teacher at the 11    end of the immediately preceding school term, credit shall 12    be granted from July 1 of the year in which he or she 13    entered service; if entry occurs during the school term 14    and the teacher was in teaching service at the beginning 15    of the school term, credit shall be granted from July 1 of 16    such year. In all other cases where credit for military 17    service is allowed, credit shall be granted from the date 18    of entry into the service.19        The total period of military service for which credit 20    is granted shall not exceed 5 years for any member unless 21    the service: (A) is validated before July 1, 1964, and (B) 22    does not extend beyond July 1, 1963. Credit for military 23    service shall be granted under this Section only if not 24    more than 5 years of the military service for which credit 25    is granted under this Section is used by the member to 26    qualify for a military retirement allotment from any   SB1878- 6 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1    branch of the armed forces of the United States. The 2    changes to this paragraph (3) made by Public Act 86-272 3    shall apply not only to persons who on or after its 4    effective date (August 23, 1989) are in service as a 5    teacher under the System, but also to persons whose status 6    as such a teacher terminated prior to such effective date, 7    whether or not such person is an annuitant on that date.8        (4) Any periods served as a member of the General 9    Assembly.10        (5)(i) Any periods for which a teacher, as defined in 11    Section 16-106, is granted a leave of absence, provided he 12    or she returns to teaching service creditable under this 13    System or the State Universities Retirement System 14    following the leave; (ii) periods during which a teacher 15    is involuntarily laid off from teaching, provided he or 16    she returns to teaching following the lay-off; (iii) 17    periods prior to July 1, 1983 during which a teacher 18    ceased covered employment due to pregnancy, provided that 19    the teacher returned to teaching service creditable under 20    this System or the State Universities Retirement System 21    following the pregnancy and submits evidence satisfactory 22    to the Board documenting that the employment ceased due to 23    pregnancy; and (iv) periods prior to July 1, 1983 during 24    which a teacher ceased covered employment for the purpose 25    of adopting an infant under 3 years of age or caring for a 26    newly adopted infant under 3 years of age, provided that   SB1878- 7 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1    the teacher returned to teaching service creditable under 2    this System or the State Universities Retirement System 3    following the adoption and submits evidence satisfactory 4    to the Board documenting that the employment ceased for 5    the purpose of adopting an infant under 3 years of age or 6    caring for a newly adopted infant under 3 years of age. 7    However, total credit under this paragraph (5) may not 8    exceed 3 years.9        Any qualified member or annuitant may apply for credit 10    under item (iii) or (iv) of this paragraph (5) without 11    regard to whether service was terminated before June 27, 12    1997 (the effective date of Public Act 90-32). In the case 13    of an annuitant who establishes credit under item (iii) or 14    (iv), the annuity shall be recalculated to include the 15    additional service credit. The increase in annuity shall 16    take effect on the date the System receives written 17    notification of the annuitant's intent to purchase the 18    credit, if the required evidence is submitted and the 19    required contribution paid within 60 days of that 20    notification, otherwise on the first annuity payment date 21    following the System's receipt of the required evidence 22    and contribution. The increase in an annuity recalculated 23    under this provision shall be included in the calculation 24    of automatic annual increases in the annuity accruing 25    after the effective date of the recalculation.26        Optional credit may be purchased under this paragraph   SB1878- 8 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1    (5) for periods during which a teacher has been granted a 2    leave of absence pursuant to Section 24-13 of the School 3    Code. A teacher whose service under this Article 4    terminated prior to the effective date of Public Act 5    86-1488 shall be eligible to purchase such optional 6    credit. If a teacher who purchases this optional credit is 7    already receiving a retirement annuity under this Article, 8    the annuity shall be recalculated as if the annuitant had 9    applied for the leave of absence credit at the time of 10    retirement. The difference between the entitled annuity 11    and the actual annuity shall be credited to the purchase 12    of the optional credit. The remainder of the purchase cost 13    of the optional credit shall be paid on or before April 1, 14    1992.15        The change in this paragraph made by Public Act 86-273 16    shall be applicable to teachers who retire after June 1, 17    1989, as well as to teachers who are in service on that 18    date.19        (6) Any days of unused and uncompensated accumulated 20    sick leave earned by a teacher. The service credit granted 21    under this paragraph shall be the ratio of the number of 22    unused and uncompensated accumulated sick leave days to 23    170 days, subject to a maximum of 2 years of service 24    credit. Prior to the member's retirement, each former 25    employer shall certify to the System the number of unused 26    and uncompensated accumulated sick leave days credited to   SB1878- 9 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1    the member at the time of termination of service. The 2    period of unused sick leave shall not be considered in 3    determining the effective date of retirement. A member is 4    not required to make contributions in order to obtain 5    service credit for unused sick leave.6        Credit for sick leave shall, at retirement, be granted 7    by the System for any retiring regional or assistant 8    regional superintendent of schools at the rate of 6 days 9    per year of creditable service or portion thereof 10    established while serving as such superintendent or 11    assistant superintendent.12        (7) Periods prior to February 1, 1987 served as an 13    employee of the Illinois Mathematics and Science Academy 14    for which credit has not been terminated under Section 15    15-113.9 of this Code.16        (8) Service as a substitute teacher for work performed 17    prior to July 1, 1990.18        (9) Service as a part-time teacher for work performed 19    prior to July 1, 1990.20        (10) Up to 2 years of employment with Southern 21    Illinois University - Carbondale from September 1, 1959 to 22    August 31, 1961, or with Governors State University from 23    September 1, 1972 to August 31, 1974, for which the 24    teacher has no credit under Article 15. To receive credit 25    under this item (10), a teacher must apply in writing to 26    the Board and pay the required contributions before May 1,   SB1878- 10 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1    1993 and have at least 12 years of service credit under 2    this Article.3        (11) Periods of service as a student teacher as 4    described in Section 24-8.5 of the School Code for which 5    the student teacher received a salary. 6        (12) Periods of service as a student teacher under 7    Section 9.45 of the Board of Higher Education Act. 8    (b-1) A member may establish optional credit for up to 2 9years of service as a teacher or administrator employed by a 10private school recognized by the Illinois State Board of 11Education, provided that the teacher (i) was certified under 12the law governing the certification of teachers at the time 13the service was rendered, (ii) applies in writing on or before 14June 30, 2028, (iii) supplies satisfactory evidence of the 15employment, (iv) completes at least 10 years of contributing 16service as a teacher as defined in Section 16-106, and (v) pays 17the contribution required in subsection (d-5) of Section 1816-128. The member may apply for credit under this subsection 19and pay the required contribution before completing the 10 20years of contributing service required under item (iv), but 21the credit may not be used until the item (iv) contributing 22service requirement has been met.23    (c) The service credits specified in this Section shall be 24granted only if: (1) such service credits are not used for 25credit in any other statutory tax-supported public employee 26retirement system other than the federal Social Security   SB1878- 11 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1program; and (2) the member makes the required contributions 2as specified in Section 16-128. Except as provided in 3subsection (b-1) of this Section, the service credit shall be 4effective as of the date the required contributions are 5completed.6    Any service credits granted under this Section shall 7terminate upon cessation of membership for any cause.8    Credit may not be granted under this Section covering any 9period for which an age retirement or disability retirement 10allowance has been paid.11    Credit may not be granted under this Section for service 12as an employee of an entity that provides substitute teaching 13services under Section 2-3.173 of the School Code and is not a 14school district. 15(Source: P.A. 102-525, eff. 8-20-21; 103-17, eff. 6-9-23; 16103-525, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 17    (40 ILCS 5/16-158)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 16-158)18    Sec. 16-158. Contributions by State and other employing 19units. 20    (a) The State shall make contributions to the System by 21means of appropriations from the Common School Fund and other 22State funds of amounts which, together with other employer 23contributions, employee contributions, investment income, and 24other income, will be sufficient to meet the cost of 25maintaining and administering the System on a 90% funded basis   SB1878- 12 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1in accordance with actuarial recommendations.2    The Board shall determine the amount of State 3contributions required for each fiscal year on the basis of 4the actuarial tables and other assumptions adopted by the 5Board and the recommendations of the actuary, using the 6formula in subsection (b-3).7    (a-1) Annually, on or before November 15 until November 815, 2011, the Board shall certify to the Governor the amount of 9the required State contribution for the coming fiscal year. 10The certification under this subsection (a-1) shall include a 11copy of the actuarial recommendations upon which it is based 12and shall specifically identify the System's projected State 13normal cost for that fiscal year.14    On or before May 1, 2004, the Board shall recalculate and 15recertify to the Governor the amount of the required State 16contribution to the System for State fiscal year 2005, taking 17into account the amounts appropriated to and received by the 18System under subsection (d) of Section 7.2 of the General 19Obligation Bond Act.20    On or before July 1, 2005, the Board shall recalculate and 21recertify to the Governor the amount of the required State 22contribution to the System for State fiscal year 2006, taking 23into account the changes in required State contributions made 24by Public Act 94-4. 25    On or before April 1, 2011, the Board shall recalculate 26and recertify to the Governor the amount of the required State   SB1878- 13 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1contribution to the System for State fiscal year 2011, 2applying the changes made by Public Act 96-889 to the System's 3assets and liabilities as of June 30, 2009 as though Public Act 496-889 was approved on that date. 5    (a-5) On or before November 1 of each year, beginning 6November 1, 2012, the Board shall submit to the State Actuary, 7the Governor, and the General Assembly a proposed 8certification of the amount of the required State contribution 9to the System for the next fiscal year, along with all of the 10actuarial assumptions, calculations, and data upon which that 11proposed certification is based. On or before January 1 of 12each year, beginning January 1, 2013, the State Actuary shall 13issue a preliminary report concerning the proposed 14certification and identifying, if necessary, recommended 15changes in actuarial assumptions that the Board must consider 16before finalizing its certification of the required State 17contributions. On or before January 15, 2013 and each January 1815 thereafter, the Board shall certify to the Governor and the 19General Assembly the amount of the required State contribution 20for the next fiscal year. The Board's certification must note 21any deviations from the State Actuary's recommended changes, 22the reason or reasons for not following the State Actuary's 23recommended changes, and the fiscal impact of not following 24the State Actuary's recommended changes on the required State 25contribution. 26    (a-10) By November 1, 2017, the Board shall recalculate   SB1878- 14 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1and recertify to the State Actuary, the Governor, and the 2General Assembly the amount of the State contribution to the 3System for State fiscal year 2018, taking into account the 4changes in required State contributions made by Public Act 5100-23. The State Actuary shall review the assumptions and 6valuations underlying the Board's revised certification and 7issue a preliminary report concerning the proposed 8recertification and identifying, if necessary, recommended 9changes in actuarial assumptions that the Board must consider 10before finalizing its certification of the required State 11contributions. The Board's final certification must note any 12deviations from the State Actuary's recommended changes, the 13reason or reasons for not following the State Actuary's 14recommended changes, and the fiscal impact of not following 15the State Actuary's recommended changes on the required State 16contribution. 17    (a-15) On or after June 15, 2019, but no later than June 1830, 2019, the Board shall recalculate and recertify to the 19Governor and the General Assembly the amount of the State 20contribution to the System for State fiscal year 2019, taking 21into account the changes in required State contributions made 22by Public Act 100-587. The recalculation shall be made using 23assumptions adopted by the Board for the original fiscal year 242019 certification. The monthly voucher for the 12th month of 25fiscal year 2019 shall be paid by the Comptroller after the 26recertification required pursuant to this subsection is   SB1878- 15 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1submitted to the Governor, Comptroller, and General Assembly. 2The recertification submitted to the General Assembly shall be 3filed with the Clerk of the House of Representatives and the 4Secretary of the Senate in electronic form only, in the manner 5that the Clerk and the Secretary shall direct. 6    (b) Through State fiscal year 1995, the State 7contributions shall be paid to the System in accordance with 8Section 18-7 of the School Code.9    (b-1) Unless otherwise directed by the Comptroller under 10subsection (b-1.1), the Board shall submit vouchers for 11payment of State contributions to the System for the 12applicable month on the 15th day of each month, or as soon 13thereafter as may be practicable. The amount vouchered for a 14monthly payment shall total one-twelfth of the required annual 15State contribution certified under subsection (a-1). 16    (b-1.1) Beginning in State fiscal year 2025, if the 17Comptroller requests that the Board submit, during a State 18fiscal year, vouchers for multiple monthly payments for the 19advance payment of State contributions due to the System for 20that State fiscal year, then the Board shall submit those 21additional vouchers as directed by the Comptroller, 22notwithstanding subsection (b-1). Unless an act of 23appropriations provides otherwise, nothing in this Section 24authorizes the Board to submit, in a State fiscal year, 25vouchers for the payment of State contributions to the System 26in an amount that exceeds the rate of payroll that is certified   SB1878- 16 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1by the System under this Section for that State fiscal year. 2    (b-1.2) The vouchers described in subsections (b-1) and 3(b-1.1) shall be paid by the State Comptroller and Treasurer 4by warrants drawn on the funds appropriated to the System for 5that fiscal year.6    If in any month the amount remaining unexpended from all 7other appropriations to the System for the applicable fiscal 8year (including the appropriations to the System under Section 98.12 of the State Finance Act and Section 1 of the State 10Pension Funds Continuing Appropriation Act) is less than the 11amount lawfully vouchered under this subsection, the 12difference shall be paid from the Common School Fund under the 13continuing appropriation authority provided in Section 1.1 of 14the State Pension Funds Continuing Appropriation Act.15    (b-2) Allocations from the Common School Fund apportioned 16to school districts not coming under this System shall not be 17diminished or affected by the provisions of this Article.18    (b-3) For State fiscal years 2012 through 2045, the 19minimum contribution to the System to be made by the State for 20each fiscal year shall be an amount determined by the System to 21be sufficient to bring the total assets of the System up to 90% 22of the total actuarial liabilities of the System by the end of 23State fiscal year 2045. In making these determinations, the 24required State contribution shall be calculated each year as a 25level percentage of payroll over the years remaining to and 26including fiscal year 2045 and shall be determined under the   SB1878- 17 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1projected unit credit actuarial cost method.2    For each of State fiscal years 2018, 2019, and 2020, the 3State shall make an additional contribution to the System 4equal to 2% of the total payroll of each employee who is deemed 5to have elected the benefits under Section 1-161 or who has 6made the election under subsection (c) of Section 1-161. 7    A change in an actuarial or investment assumption that 8increases or decreases the required State contribution and 9first applies in State fiscal year 2018 or thereafter shall be 10implemented in equal annual amounts over a 5-year period 11beginning in the State fiscal year in which the actuarial 12change first applies to the required State contribution.13    A change in an actuarial or investment assumption that 14increases or decreases the required State contribution and 15first applied to the State contribution in fiscal year 2014, 162015, 2016, or 2017 shall be implemented:17        (i) as already applied in State fiscal years before 18    2018; and19        (ii) in the portion of the 5-year period beginning in 20    the State fiscal year in which the actuarial change first 21    applied that occurs in State fiscal year 2018 or 22    thereafter, by calculating the change in equal annual 23    amounts over that 5-year period and then implementing it 24    at the resulting annual rate in each of the remaining 25    fiscal years in that 5-year period.26    For State fiscal years 1996 through 2005, the State   SB1878- 18 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1contribution to the System, as a percentage of the applicable 2employee payroll, shall be increased in equal annual 3increments so that by State fiscal year 2011, the State is 4contributing at the rate required under this Section; except 5that in the following specified State fiscal years, the State 6contribution to the System shall not be less than the 7following indicated percentages of the applicable employee 8payroll, even if the indicated percentage will produce a State 9contribution in excess of the amount otherwise required under 10this subsection and subsection (a), and notwithstanding any 11contrary certification made under subsection (a-1) before May 1227, 1998 (the effective date of Public Act 90-582): 10.02% in 13FY 1999; 10.77% in FY 2000; 11.47% in FY 2001; 12.16% in FY 142002; 12.86% in FY 2003; and 13.56% in FY 2004.15    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, the 16total required State contribution for State fiscal year 2006 17is $534,627,700. 18    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, the 19total required State contribution for State fiscal year 2007 20is $738,014,500. 21    For each of State fiscal years 2008 through 2009, the 22State contribution to the System, as a percentage of the 23applicable employee payroll, shall be increased in equal 24annual increments from the required State contribution for 25State fiscal year 2007, so that by State fiscal year 2011, the 26State is contributing at the rate otherwise required under   SB1878- 19 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1this Section. 2    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, the 3total required State contribution for State fiscal year 2010 4is $2,089,268,000 and shall be made from the proceeds of bonds 5sold in fiscal year 2010 pursuant to Section 7.2 of the General 6Obligation Bond Act, less (i) the pro rata share of bond sale 7expenses determined by the System's share of total bond 8proceeds, (ii) any amounts received from the Common School 9Fund in fiscal year 2010, and (iii) any reduction in bond 10proceeds due to the issuance of discounted bonds, if 11applicable. 12    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, the 13total required State contribution for State fiscal year 2011 14is the amount recertified by the System on or before April 1, 152011 pursuant to subsection (a-1) of this Section and shall be 16made from the proceeds of bonds sold in fiscal year 2011 17pursuant to Section 7.2 of the General Obligation Bond Act, 18less (i) the pro rata share of bond sale expenses determined by 19the System's share of total bond proceeds, (ii) any amounts 20received from the Common School Fund in fiscal year 2011, and 21(iii) any reduction in bond proceeds due to the issuance of 22discounted bonds, if applicable. This amount shall include, in 23addition to the amount certified by the System, an amount 24necessary to meet employer contributions required by the State 25as an employer under paragraph (e) of this Section, which may 26also be used by the System for contributions required by   SB1878- 20 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1paragraph (a) of Section 16-127. 2    Beginning in State fiscal year 2046, the minimum State 3contribution for each fiscal year shall be the amount needed 4to maintain the total assets of the System at 90% of the total 5actuarial liabilities of the System.6    Amounts received by the System pursuant to Section 25 of 7the Budget Stabilization Act or Section 8.12 of the State 8Finance Act in any fiscal year do not reduce and do not 9constitute payment of any portion of the minimum State 10contribution required under this Article in that fiscal year. 11Such amounts shall not reduce, and shall not be included in the 12calculation of, the required State contributions under this 13Article in any future year until the System has reached a 14funding ratio of at least 90%. A reference in this Article to 15the "required State contribution" or any substantially similar 16term does not include or apply to any amounts payable to the 17System under Section 25 of the Budget Stabilization Act.18    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, the 19required State contribution for State fiscal year 2005 and for 20fiscal year 2008 and each fiscal year thereafter, as 21calculated under this Section and certified under subsection 22(a-1), shall not exceed an amount equal to (i) the amount of 23the required State contribution that would have been 24calculated under this Section for that fiscal year if the 25System had not received any payments under subsection (d) of 26Section 7.2 of the General Obligation Bond Act, minus (ii) the   SB1878- 21 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1portion of the State's total debt service payments for that 2fiscal year on the bonds issued in fiscal year 2003 for the 3purposes of that Section 7.2, as determined and certified by 4the Comptroller, that is the same as the System's portion of 5the total moneys distributed under subsection (d) of Section 67.2 of the General Obligation Bond Act. In determining this 7maximum for State fiscal years 2008 through 2010, however, the 8amount referred to in item (i) shall be increased, as a 9percentage of the applicable employee payroll, in equal 10increments calculated from the sum of the required State 11contribution for State fiscal year 2007 plus the applicable 12portion of the State's total debt service payments for fiscal 13year 2007 on the bonds issued in fiscal year 2003 for the 14purposes of Section 7.2 of the General Obligation Bond Act, so 15that, by State fiscal year 2011, the State is contributing at 16the rate otherwise required under this Section.17    (b-4) Beginning in fiscal year 2018, each employer under 18this Article shall pay to the System a required contribution 19determined as a percentage of projected payroll and sufficient 20to produce an annual amount equal to:21        (i) for each of fiscal years 2018, 2019, and 2020, the 22    defined benefit normal cost of the defined benefit plan, 23    less the employee contribution, for each employee of that 24    employer who has elected or who is deemed to have elected 25    the benefits under Section 1-161 or who has made the 26    election under subsection (b) of Section 1-161; for fiscal   SB1878- 22 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1    year 2021 and each fiscal year thereafter, the defined 2    benefit normal cost of the defined benefit plan, less the 3    employee contribution, plus 2%, for each employee of that 4    employer who has elected or who is deemed to have elected 5    the benefits under Section 1-161 or who has made the 6    election under subsection (b) of Section 1-161; plus7        (ii) the amount required for that fiscal year to 8    amortize any unfunded actuarial accrued liability 9    associated with the present value of liabilities 10    attributable to the employer's account under Section 11    16-158.3, determined as a level percentage of payroll over 12    a 30-year rolling amortization period.13    In determining contributions required under item (i) of 14this subsection, the System shall determine an aggregate rate 15for all employers, expressed as a percentage of projected 16payroll. 17    In determining the contributions required under item (ii) 18of this subsection, the amount shall be computed by the System 19on the basis of the actuarial assumptions and tables used in 20the most recent actuarial valuation of the System that is 21available at the time of the computation. 22    The contributions required under this subsection (b-4) 23shall be paid by an employer concurrently with that employer's 24payroll payment period. The State, as the actual employer of 25an employee, shall make the required contributions under this 26subsection.   SB1878- 23 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1    (c) Payment of the required State contributions and of all 2pensions, retirement annuities, death benefits, refunds, and 3other benefits granted under or assumed by this System, and 4all expenses in connection with the administration and 5operation thereof, are obligations of the State.6    If members are paid from special trust or federal funds 7which are administered by the employing unit, whether school 8district or other unit, the employing unit shall pay to the 9System from such funds the full accruing retirement costs 10based upon that service, which, beginning July 1, 2017, shall 11be at a rate, expressed as a percentage of salary, equal to the 12total employer's normal cost, expressed as a percentage of 13payroll, as determined by the System. Employer contributions, 14based on salary paid to members from federal funds, may be 15forwarded by the distributing agency of the State of Illinois 16to the System prior to allocation, in an amount determined in 17accordance with guidelines established by such agency and the 18System. Any contribution for fiscal year 2015 collected as a 19result of the change made by Public Act 98-674 shall be 20considered a State contribution under subsection (b-3) of this 21Section. 22    (d) Effective July 1, 1986, any employer of a teacher as 23defined in paragraph (8) of Section 16-106 shall pay the 24employer's normal cost of benefits based upon the teacher's 25service, in addition to employee contributions, as determined 26by the System. Such employer contributions shall be forwarded   SB1878- 24 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1monthly in accordance with guidelines established by the 2System.3    However, with respect to benefits granted under Section 416-133.4 or 16-133.5 to a teacher as defined in paragraph (8) 5of Section 16-106, the employer's contribution shall be 12% 6(rather than 20%) of the member's highest annual salary rate 7for each year of creditable service granted, and the employer 8shall also pay the required employee contribution on behalf of 9the teacher. For the purposes of Sections 16-133.4 and 1016-133.5, a teacher as defined in paragraph (8) of Section 1116-106 who is serving in that capacity while on leave of 12absence from another employer under this Article shall not be 13considered an employee of the employer from which the teacher 14is on leave.15    (e) Beginning July 1, 1998, every employer of a teacher 16shall pay to the System an employer contribution computed as 17follows:18        (1) Beginning July 1, 1998 through June 30, 1999, the 19    employer contribution shall be equal to 0.3% of each 20    teacher's salary.21        (2) Beginning July 1, 1999 and thereafter, the 22    employer contribution shall be equal to 0.58% of each 23    teacher's salary.24The school district or other employing unit may pay these 25employer contributions out of any source of funding available 26for that purpose and shall forward the contributions to the   SB1878- 25 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1System on the schedule established for the payment of member 2contributions.3    These employer contributions are intended to offset a 4portion of the cost to the System of the increases in 5retirement benefits resulting from Public Act 90-582.6    Each employer of teachers is entitled to a credit against 7the contributions required under this subsection (e) with 8respect to salaries paid to teachers for the period January 1, 92002 through June 30, 2003, equal to the amount paid by that 10employer under subsection (a-5) of Section 6.6 of the State 11Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 with respect to salaries 12paid to teachers for that period.13    The additional 1% employee contribution required under 14Section 16-152 by Public Act 90-582 is the responsibility of 15the teacher and not the teacher's employer, unless the 16employer agrees, through collective bargaining or otherwise, 17to make the contribution on behalf of the teacher.18    If an employer is required by a contract in effect on May 191, 1998 between the employer and an employee organization to 20pay, on behalf of all its full-time employees covered by this 21Article, all mandatory employee contributions required under 22this Article, then the employer shall be excused from paying 23the employer contribution required under this subsection (e) 24for the balance of the term of that contract. The employer and 25the employee organization shall jointly certify to the System 26the existence of the contractual requirement, in such form as   SB1878- 26 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1the System may prescribe. This exclusion shall cease upon the 2termination, extension, or renewal of the contract at any time 3after May 1, 1998.4    (f) If the amount of a teacher's salary for any school year 5used to determine final average salary exceeds the member's 6annual full-time salary rate with the same employer for the 7previous school year by more than 6%, the teacher's employer 8shall pay to the System, in addition to all other payments 9required under this Section and in accordance with guidelines 10established by the System, the present value of the increase 11in benefits resulting from the portion of the increase in 12salary that is in excess of 6%. This present value shall be 13computed by the System on the basis of the actuarial 14assumptions and tables used in the most recent actuarial 15valuation of the System that is available at the time of the 16computation. If a teacher's salary for the 2005-2006 school 17year is used to determine final average salary under this 18subsection (f), then the changes made to this subsection (f) 19by Public Act 94-1057 shall apply in calculating whether the 20increase in his or her salary is in excess of 6%. For the 21purposes of this Section, change in employment under Section 2210-21.12 of the School Code on or after June 1, 2005 shall 23constitute a change in employer. The System may require the 24employer to provide any pertinent information or 25documentation. The changes made to this subsection (f) by 26Public Act 94-1111 apply without regard to whether the teacher   SB1878- 27 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1was in service on or after its effective date. 2    Whenever it determines that a payment is or may be 3required under this subsection, the System shall calculate the 4amount of the payment and bill the employer for that amount. 5The bill shall specify the calculations used to determine the 6amount due. If the employer disputes the amount of the bill, it 7may, within 30 days after receipt of the bill, apply to the 8System in writing for a recalculation. The application must 9specify in detail the grounds of the dispute and, if the 10employer asserts that the calculation is subject to subsection 11(g), (g-5), (g-10), (g-15), (g-20), (g-25), or (h) of this 12Section, must include an affidavit setting forth and attesting 13to all facts within the employer's knowledge that are 14pertinent to the applicability of that subsection. Upon 15receiving a timely application for recalculation, the System 16shall review the application and, if appropriate, recalculate 17the amount due. 18    The employer contributions required under this subsection 19(f) may be paid in the form of a lump sum within 90 days after 20receipt of the bill. If the employer contributions are not 21paid within 90 days after receipt of the bill, then interest 22will be charged at a rate equal to the System's annual 23actuarially assumed rate of return on investment compounded 24annually from the 91st day after receipt of the bill. Payments 25must be concluded within 3 years after the employer's receipt 26of the bill.   SB1878- 28 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1    (f-1) (Blank).2    (g) This subsection (g) applies only to payments made or 3salary increases given on or after June 1, 2005 but before July 41, 2011. The changes made by Public Act 94-1057 shall not 5require the System to refund any payments received before July 631, 2006 (the effective date of Public Act 94-1057).7    When assessing payment for any amount due under subsection 8(f), the System shall exclude salary increases paid to 9teachers under contracts or collective bargaining agreements 10entered into, amended, or renewed before June 1, 2005. 11    When assessing payment for any amount due under subsection 12(f), the System shall exclude salary increases paid to a 13teacher at a time when the teacher is 10 or more years from 14retirement eligibility under Section 16-132 or 16-133.2. 15    When assessing payment for any amount due under subsection 16(f), the System shall exclude salary increases resulting from 17overload work, including summer school, when the school 18district has certified to the System, and the System has 19approved the certification, that (i) the overload work is for 20the sole purpose of classroom instruction in excess of the 21standard number of classes for a full-time teacher in a school 22district during a school year and (ii) the salary increases 23are equal to or less than the rate of pay for classroom 24instruction computed on the teacher's current salary and work 25schedule. 26    When assessing payment for any amount due under subsection   SB1878- 29 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1(f), the System shall exclude a salary increase resulting from 2a promotion (i) for which the employee is required to hold a 3certificate or supervisory endorsement issued by the State 4Teacher Certification Board that is a different certification 5or supervisory endorsement than is required for the teacher's 6previous position and (ii) to a position that has existed and 7been filled by a member for no less than one complete academic 8year and the salary increase from the promotion is an increase 9that results in an amount no greater than the lesser of the 10average salary paid for other similar positions in the 11district requiring the same certification or the amount 12stipulated in the collective bargaining agreement for a 13similar position requiring the same certification. 14    When assessing payment for any amount due under subsection 15(f), the System shall exclude any payment to the teacher from 16the State of Illinois or the State Board of Education over 17which the employer does not have discretion, notwithstanding 18that the payment is included in the computation of final 19average salary. 20    (g-5) When assessing payment for any amount due under 21subsection (f), the System shall exclude salary increases 22resulting from overload or stipend work performed in a school 23year subsequent to a school year in which the employer was 24unable to offer or allow to be conducted overload or stipend 25work due to an emergency declaration limiting such activities.26    (g-10) When assessing payment for any amount due under   SB1878- 30 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1subsection (f), the System shall exclude salary increases 2resulting from increased instructional time that exceeded the 3instructional time required during the 2019-2020 school year. 4    (g-15) When assessing payment for any amount due under 5subsection (f), the System shall exclude salary increases 6resulting from teaching summer school on or after May 1, 2021 7and before September 15, 2022. 8    (g-20) When assessing payment for any amount due under 9subsection (f), the System shall exclude salary increases 10necessary to bring a school board in compliance with Public 11Act 101-443 or this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 12Assembly. 13    (g-25) When assessing payment for any amount due under 14subsection (f), the System shall exclude any stipends paid to 15an eligible cooperating teacher under Section 9.45 of the 16Board of Higher Education Act. 17    (h) When assessing payment for any amount due under 18subsection (f), the System shall exclude any salary increase 19described in subsection (g) of this Section given on or after 20July 1, 2011 but before July 1, 2014 under a contract or 21collective bargaining agreement entered into, amended, or 22renewed on or after June 1, 2005 but before July 1, 2011. 23Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, any 24payments made or salary increases given after June 30, 2014 25shall be used in assessing payment for any amount due under 26subsection (f) of this Section.   SB1878- 31 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1    (i) The System shall prepare a report and file copies of 2the report with the Governor and the General Assembly by 3January 1, 2007 that contains all of the following 4information:5        (1) The number of recalculations required by the 6    changes made to this Section by Public Act 94-1057 for 7    each employer.8        (2) The dollar amount by which each employer's 9    contribution to the System was changed due to 10    recalculations required by Public Act 94-1057.11        (3) The total amount the System received from each 12    employer as a result of the changes made to this Section by 13    Public Act 94-4.14        (4) The increase in the required State contribution 15    resulting from the changes made to this Section by Public 16    Act 94-1057. 17    (i-5) For school years beginning on or after July 1, 2017, 18if the amount of a participant's salary for any school year 19exceeds the amount of the salary set for the Governor, the 20participant's employer shall pay to the System, in addition to 21all other payments required under this Section and in 22accordance with guidelines established by the System, an 23amount determined by the System to be equal to the employer 24normal cost, as established by the System and expressed as a 25total percentage of payroll, multiplied by the amount of 26salary in excess of the amount of the salary set for the   SB1878- 32 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1Governor. This amount shall be computed by the System on the 2basis of the actuarial assumptions and tables used in the most 3recent actuarial valuation of the System that is available at 4the time of the computation. The System may require the 5employer to provide any pertinent information or 6documentation.7    Whenever it determines that a payment is or may be 8required under this subsection, the System shall calculate the 9amount of the payment and bill the employer for that amount. 10The bill shall specify the calculations used to determine the 11amount due. If the employer disputes the amount of the bill, it 12may, within 30 days after receipt of the bill, apply to the 13System in writing for a recalculation. The application must 14specify in detail the grounds of the dispute. Upon receiving a 15timely application for recalculation, the System shall review 16the application and, if appropriate, recalculate the amount 17due. 18    The employer contributions required under this subsection 19may be paid in the form of a lump sum within 90 days after 20receipt of the bill. If the employer contributions are not 21paid within 90 days after receipt of the bill, then interest 22will be charged at a rate equal to the System's annual 23actuarially assumed rate of return on investment compounded 24annually from the 91st day after receipt of the bill. Payments 25must be concluded within 3 years after the employer's receipt 26of the bill.   SB1878- 33 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1    (j) For purposes of determining the required State 2contribution to the System, the value of the System's assets 3shall be equal to the actuarial value of the System's assets, 4which shall be calculated as follows:5    As of June 30, 2008, the actuarial value of the System's 6assets shall be equal to the market value of the assets as of 7that date. In determining the actuarial value of the System's 8assets for fiscal years after June 30, 2008, any actuarial 9gains or losses from investment return incurred in a fiscal 10year shall be recognized in equal annual amounts over the 115-year period following that fiscal year. 12    (k) For purposes of determining the required State 13contribution to the system for a particular year, the 14actuarial value of assets shall be assumed to earn a rate of 15return equal to the system's actuarially assumed rate of 16return. 17(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-525, eff. 8-20-21; 18102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-515, eff. 198-11-23; 103-588, eff. 6-5-24.) 20    (40 ILCS 5/16-203)21    Sec. 16-203. Application and expiration of new benefit 22increases.23    (a) As used in this Section, "new benefit increase" means 24an increase in the amount of any benefit provided under this 25Article, or an expansion of the conditions of eligibility for   SB1878- 34 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1any benefit under this Article, that results from an amendment 2to this Code that takes effect after June 1, 2005 (the 3effective date of Public Act 94-4). "New benefit increase", 4however, does not include any benefit increase resulting from 5the changes made to Article 1 or this Article by Public Act 695-910, Public Act 100-23, Public Act 100-587, Public Act 7100-743, Public Act 100-769, Public Act 101-10, Public Act 8101-49, Public Act 102-16, or Public Act 102-871, or this 9amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.10    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code or 11any subsequent amendment to this Code, every new benefit 12increase is subject to this Section and shall be deemed to be 13granted only in conformance with and contingent upon 14compliance with the provisions of this Section. 15    (c) The Public Act enacting a new benefit increase must 16identify and provide for payment to the System of additional 17funding at least sufficient to fund the resulting annual 18increase in cost to the System as it accrues.19    Every new benefit increase is contingent upon the General 20Assembly providing the additional funding required under this 21subsection. The Commission on Government Forecasting and 22Accountability shall analyze whether adequate additional 23funding has been provided for the new benefit increase and 24shall report its analysis to the Public Pension Division of 25the Department of Insurance. A new benefit increase created by 26a Public Act that does not include the additional funding   SB1878- 35 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1required under this subsection is null and void. If the Public 2Pension Division determines that the additional funding 3provided for a new benefit increase under this subsection is 4or has become inadequate, it may so certify to the Governor and 5the State Comptroller and, in the absence of corrective action 6by the General Assembly, the new benefit increase shall expire 7at the end of the fiscal year in which the certification is 8made. 9    (d) Every new benefit increase shall expire 5 years after 10its effective date or on such earlier date as may be specified 11in the language enacting the new benefit increase or provided 12under subsection (c). This does not prevent the General 13Assembly from extending or re-creating a new benefit increase 14by law.15    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the language creating 16the new benefit increase, a new benefit increase that expires 17under this Section continues to apply to persons who applied 18and qualified for the affected benefit while the new benefit 19increase was in effect and to the affected beneficiaries and 20alternate payees of such persons, but does not apply to any 21other person, including, without limitation, a person who 22continues in service after the expiration date and did not 23apply and qualify for the affected benefit while the new 24benefit increase was in effect.25(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 26102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-871, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff.   SB1878- 36 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b16-30-23.) 2    Section 15. The Board of Higher Education Act is amended 3by adding Section 9.45 as follows: 4    (110 ILCS 205/9.45 new)5    Sec. 9.45. Student teaching stipend program.6    (a) As used in this Section:7    "Educator preparation program" means an approved educator 8preparation program offered by a recognized school or 9institution under Article 21B of the School Code.10    "Eligible cooperating teacher" means a teacher who is 11licensed under Article 21B of the School Code or has attained 12the Department of Human Services' Gateways to Opportunity 13Early Childhood Education Credential Level 5 or 6, qualified 14to teach in the subject area assigned, and matched with an 15eligible student.16    "Eligible student" means a student who is enrolled in an 17educator preparation program, who is maintaining satisfactory 18academic progress, who intends to teach in this State, who is 19placed as a student teacher, and who is not contracted as the 20teacher of record for the student teaching placement.21    "Student teaching" means a supervised clinical experience 22that prepares a candidate to take full responsibility in an 23instructional setting.24    (b) Subject to appropriation, the Board shall create a   SB1878- 37 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1student teaching stipend program to alleviate the financial 2burden of student teaching, to encourage students to pursue 3teaching careers to alleviate this State's teacher shortage, 4and to encourage teachers to be matched with student teachers.5    (c) An educator preparation program shall notify the Board 6of all eligible students and eligible cooperating teachers who 7qualify for the stipend program.8    (d) Under the stipend program and subject to available 9appropriations, the Board shall disburse to each educator 10preparation program funds to distribute to each eligible 11student a stipend of up to $10,000 per semester for up to 2 12consecutive semesters, plus additional funds to pay the direct 13costs of operating the stipend program. The educator 14preparation program shall distribute stipend funds using the 15standard methods for allocating State-based financial aid or 16as wages for employment to each eligible student in monthly 17installments.18    (e) If there is a surplus appropriated in a fiscal year for 19the stipend program, then the Board shall increase the amount 20disbursed to each educator preparation program by the same 21percentage that the surplus bears to the amount required to 22fully fund the total number of eligible students who qualify 23for the stipend program that fiscal year. An educator 24preparation program shall increase the stipend amount 25distributed to each eligible student in proportion to the 26surplus.  SB1878- 38 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1    (f) If the amount appropriated in a fiscal year for the 2stipend program is insufficient to fully fund stipends for the 3total number of eligible students for that fiscal year, then 4the Board shall prioritize eligible students based on 5demonstrated financial need reported by each educator 6preparation program.7    (g) Funds not distributed in a particular fiscal year by 8an educator preparation program under this Section shall be 9returned to the Board to be used for the subsequent fiscal 10year's stipend program.11    (h) An educator preparation program may not prohibit an 12eligible student from participating in the stipend program or 13from receiving a stipend from the stipend program. 14    (i) Under the stipend program and subject to available 15appropriations, the Board shall disburse funds to the State 16Board of Education, who shall disburse funds to each school 17district or early childhood education provider employing an 18eligible cooperating teacher to distribute to each eligible 19cooperating teacher a stipend of up to $2,000 per semester for 20up to 2 consecutive semesters per academic year. The school 21district or early childhood education provider shall 22distribute stipend funds to an eligible cooperating teacher in 23one payment.24    (j) An eligible cooperating teacher who receives a stipend 25must complete State-approved, evidence-based training that 26aligns with training for instructional coaches, covers basic   SB1878- 39 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1responsibilities of a cooperating teacher, includes 2evidence-based practices in supporting student teachers in 3school or early childhood settings, and includes the effective 4assessment of student teachers that aligns with State educator 5performance evaluation requirements or the equivalent for 6early childhood education. The State Board of Education shall 7develop training that meets the criteria of this subsection 8and that is available to cooperating teachers.9    (k) If there is a surplus appropriated in a fiscal year for 10the stipend program, then the Board shall increase the amount 11disbursed to the State Board of Education to disburse to each 12school district or early childhood education provider by the 13same percentage that the surplus bears to the amount required 14to fully fund the total number of eligible cooperating 15teachers who qualify for the stipend program that fiscal year. 16A school district or early childhood education provider shall 17increase the stipend amount distributed to each eligible 18cooperating teacher in proportion to the surplus.19    (l) If the amount appropriated in a fiscal year for the 20stipend program is insufficient to fully fund stipends for the 21total number of eligible cooperating teachers for that fiscal 22year, then the Board shall reduce the amount disbursed to the 23State Board of Education to disburse to each school district 24or early childhood education provider by the same percentage 25that the deficit bears to the amount required to fully fund the 26total number of eligible cooperating teachers who qualify for   SB1878- 40 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1the stipend program. A school district or early childhood 2education provider shall reduce the stipend amount distributed 3to each eligible cooperating teacher in proportion to the 4deficit.5    (m) Nothing in this Section is intended to preclude an 6educator preparation program from providing an eligible 7cooperating teacher with additional incentives.8    (n) An eligible cooperating teacher participating in the 9stipend program may receive professional development hours for 10completing cooperating teacher training that count toward the 11eligible cooperating teacher's license renewal or the 12equivalent for early childhood education.13    (o) Subject to available appropriations, the Board shall 14issue a report evaluating the impact of the stipend program on 15educator preparation programs, including enrollment and 16completion rates, hiring rates, and retention rates. The Board 17shall issue this report in collaboration with the State Board 18of Education. The Board shall submit this report to the 19General Assembly and Governor on or before June 30 of the 20fiscal year following the third consecutive fiscal year during 21which the stipend program has received funding of at least 22$2,000,000.23    (p) The Board shall provide guidance and technical 24assistance to educator preparation programs on the 25administration of the stipend program. 26    (q) The Board shall adopt rules regarding the   SB1878- 41 -LRB104 11815 LNS 21905 b1administration of the stipend program, including, but not 2limited to, the allocation of funds for the stipend program. 3    (r) If the stipend program is funded prior to the adoption 4of rules under subsection (q), emergency rules regarding the 5administration of the stipend program may be adopted by the 6Board subject to the provisions of Section 5-45.65 of the 7Illinois Administrative Procedure Act.  8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.